Alabama, session 2026rs, SB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Crime Stoppers of Metro Alabama,
Incorporated, is exempted from paying state and local sales
and use tax.
(b) The exemption provided in this section may apply to
county or municipal sales and use taxes upon approval of a
resolution or ordinance adopted by the local governing body
pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 1

pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
SB235 INTRODUCED
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2